Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-301
Petition.

Whenever the inhabitants of any county are desirous of changing their county seat and upon the petition therefor being presented to the county board, which petition shall name some one city, town, village or place to which it is desired to remove the county seat, signed by the resident electors of the county equal in number to three-fifths of all votes cast in the county at the last general election held therein, and containing in addition to the names of the petitioners the section, township and range on which, or the town or city in which the petitioners reside, with their age and time of residence in the county, it shall be the duty of such board to forthwith call a special election in the county for the purpose of submitting to the qualified electors thereof the question of the removal of the county seat to the one city, town, village or place named in the petition.

Laws 1875, § 1, p. 159;

R.S.1913, § 939;

Laws 1917, c. 169, § 1, p. 380;

C.S.1922, § 845;

C.S.1929, § 25-301;

R.S.1943, § 22-301.